nb: Ukulele-bromateriale: Kompositt; Ibenholt; Lønn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Valnøtt; Annet
ko: 우쿨렐레 브리지 소재: 합성 소재; 에보니; 메이플; 오방콜; 파우 페로; 로즈우드; 월넛; 기타
hu: Ukulele híd anyaga: Kompozit; Ébenfa; Juhar; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Rózsafa; Dió; Egyéb
tr: Ukulele köprü malzemesi: Kompozit; Abanoz; Akçaağaç; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Gül ağacı; Ceviz; Diğer
el: Υλικό γέφυρας ουκουλέλε: Σύνθετο; Έβενος; Σφενδάμι; Οβανγκόλ; Pau ferro; Παλίσανδρος; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
fr: Matériau du chevalet de l’ukulélé: Composite; Ébène; Érable; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissandre; Noyer; Autre
es: Material para el puente del ukelele: Compuesto; Ébano; Arce; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisandro; Nogal; Otro
th: วัสดุสำหรับสะพานอูคูเลเล่: คอมโพสิต; อีโบนี; เมเปิ้ล; โอแวงคอล; เปาเฟอร์โร; โรสวูด; วอลนัต; อื่นๆ
cs: Materiál kobylky ukulele: Kompozit; Eben; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisandr; Ořech; Ostatní
nl: Ukulele brugmateriaal: Composiet; Ebbenhout; Esdoorn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissander; Walnoot; Anders
ru: Материал бриджа укулеле: Композитный материал; Чёрное дерево; Клён; Овангкол; Пау-ферро; Палисандр; Орех; Другое
pt-PT: Material da ponte do ukulele: Compósito; Ébano; Ácer; Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Pau-rosa; Nogueira; Outro
ro-RO: Materialul călușului ukulelei: Compozit; Abanos; Arțar; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Lemn de trandafir; Nuc; Altele
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗琴橋材質: 複合材質; 黑檀木; 楓木; 古夷蘇木; 保羅鐵木; 玫瑰木; 胡桃木; 其他
en: Ukulele bridge material: Composite; Ebony; Maple; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Rosewood; Walnut; Other
pl: Materiał mostka ukulele: Kompozyt; Heban; Klon; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Orzech; Inne
da: Bromateriale for ukulele: Komposit; Ibenholt; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Valnød; Andet
sv: Material för ukulele-bryggan: Komposit; Ebenholts; Lönn; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Rosenträ; Valnöt; Övrigt
de: Material der Ukulelenbrücke: Verbundstoff; Ebenholz; Ahorn; Ovangkol; Pau Ferro; Palisander; Walnuss; Andere
pt-BR: Ukulele cavalete material: Compósito; Ébano; Maple; Ovangkol; Pau-ferro; Jacarandá; Nogueira; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál mostíka ukulele: Kompozit; Eben; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Orech; Iné
ja: ウクレレブリッジ素材: コンポジット; エボニー; メイプル; オバンコール; パーフェロー; ローズウッド; ウォルナット; その他
sl-SI: Material mostička ukuleleja: Kompozit; Ebenovina; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisander; Oreh; Drugo
zh-CN: 尤克里里琴桥材质: 复合材料; 乌木; 枫木; 古夷苏木; 保罗铁木; 玫瑰木; 胡桃木; 其他
fi: Ukulelen tallan materiaali: Komposiitti; Eebenpuu; Vaahtera; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Ruusupuu; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
vi: Chất liệu ngựa đàn ukulele: Composite; Gỗ mun; Gỗ phong; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Gỗ cẩm lai; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
lt-LT: Ukulelės tiltelio medžiaga: Kompozitas; Juodmedis; Klevas; Ovangkolas; Pau ferro; Palisandras; Riešutmedis; Kita
it: Materiale del ponte dell'ukulele: Materiale composito; Ebano; Acero; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palissandro; Noce; Altro
hr-HR: Materijal mosta ukulele: Kompozit; Ebanovina; Javor; Ovangkol; Pau ferro; Palisandar; Orah; Ostalo
bg-BG: Материал за бриджа на укулеле: Композитен материал; Абанос; Клен; Ованкол; Пау феро; Палисандър; Орех; Друг